Maine, session 132, LD151.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 9-A MRSA §8-509, as amended by PL 2021, c. 150, §2, is further amended
to read:
§8-509. Credit card and debit card surcharge prohibition surcharges
1. Surcharge prohibited. A seller in a sales transaction may not impose a surcharge
on a cardholder who elects to use a credit card or debit card in lieu of payment by cash,
check or similar means. For purposes of this section, "surcharge" means any means of
increasing the regular price to a cardholder that is not imposed on a customer paying by
cash, check or similar means. A discount or reduction from the regular price is not a
surcharge.
1-A. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Governmental entity" includes, but is not limited to, a state department or agency,
a county established or governed by Title 30‑A, Part 1, a municipality as defined in
Title 30‑A, section 2001, subsection 8, a plantation established or governed by Title
30‑A, chapter 301, a quasi-municipal corporation as defined in Title 30‑A, section
2604, subsection 3, the Judicial Department as described in Title 4, the University of
Maine System, the Maine Community College System and the Maine Maritime
Academy.
B. "Surcharge" means any means of increasing the regular price to a cardholder that is
not imposed on a consumer paying by cash, check or similar means. "Surcharge" does
not include a discount or reduction from the regular price.
2. Surcharge permitted for governmental entity. Notwithstanding subsection 1, a
A governmental entity or seller in a sales transaction may impose a surcharge for payments
made with a credit card or debit card for taxes, fines, charges, utility fees, regulatory fees,
registration fees, license or permit fees or the provision of a specific service or good
provided by that governmental entity or seller in a sales transaction if the surcharge:
A. Is disclosed clearly to the consumer prior to payment; and
B. Does not exceed the costs associated with providing the credit card or debit card
service that are directly incurred by the governmental entity or seller in a sales
transaction or assessed by an authorized 3rd-party payment service provider for a credit
card or debit card transaction. If there is not a cost assessed by an authorized 3rd-party
payment service provider for a debit card transaction, the governmental entity or seller
in a sales transaction may not impose a surcharge associated with a debit card
transaction.
A governmental entity or seller in a sales transaction shall disclose to the consumer that the
surcharge may be avoided if the consumer makes payments by cash, check or other means
not a credit card or debit card. A governmental entity or seller in a sales transaction is not
subject to any liability to the issuer of a credit card or an authorized 3rd-party payment
service provider for nonpayment of credit card charges by the consumer. As used in this
subsection, "governmental entity" includes, but is not limited to, a state department or
agency, a county established or governed by Title 30‑A, Part 1, a municipality as defined
in Title 30‑A, section 2001, subsection 8, a plantation established or governed by Title
Page 1 - 132LR0497(01)

414 30‑A, chapter 301, a quasi-municipal corporation as defined in Title 30‑A, section 2604,
425 subsection 3, the Judicial Department as described in Title 4, the University of Maine
436 System, the Maine Community College System and the Maine Maritime Academy.
Sec. 2. 10 MRSA c. 202-B, as amended, is repealed.